src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/VerbAss_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Assimilated verbs. BRILJERE_IV, ABBONERE_TV

Tests:
  Verb - argumentierit: # BRILJERE_IV
    argumentierit+V+IV+Inf: [argumentierit, argumenterit] 
    argumentierit+V+IV+Sup: [argumentieritjit, argumenteritjit]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Ger: [argumentieridijn, argumenteridijn]
    argumentierit+V+IV+PrfPrc: [argumentierim, argumenterim]
    argumentierit+V+IV+PrsPrc: [argumentierijiddje, argumenterijiddje]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Actio+Ess: [argumentierimin, argumenterimin]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Actio+Ela: [argumentierimis, argumenterimis]
    argumentierit+V+IV+VAbess: [argumentierik, argumenterik]
    argumentierit+V+IV+VGen: [argumentieri, argumenteri]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [argumentieriv, argumenteriv]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [argumentieri, argumenteri]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [argumentieri, argumenteri]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [argumentierijin, argumenterijin] 
    argumentierit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [argumentieribihtte, argumenteribihtte]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: [argumentieriba, argumenteriba]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [argumentieriji, argumenteriji]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [argumentierijiv, argumenterijiv]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [argumentieriji, argumenteriji]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [argumentierij, argumenterij]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [argumentierijma, argumenterijma]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [argumentierijda, argumenterijda]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [argumentierijin, argumenterijin]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: [argumentieri, argumenteri]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: [argumentierijip, argumenterijip]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [argumentierijihtit, argumenterijihtit]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2+Sh: [argumentierijit, argumenterijit]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: [argumentierijisá, argumenterijisá]
    argumentierit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: [argumentierijuhtut, argumenterijuhtut]
    argumentierit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: [argumentierijusá, argumenterijusá]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Pot+Pl1: [argumentieritjip, argumenteritjip]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Pot+Pl2: [argumentieritjihpit, argumenteritjihpit]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: [argumentieritji, argumenteritji]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: [argumentieriduvvat, argumenteriduvvat]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [argumentieriduvvá, argumenteriduvvá]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: [argumentierilulu, argumenterilulu]
    argumentierit+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: [argumentierilulujma, argumenterilulujma]

  Verb - arrestierit: # ABBONERE_TV
    arrestierit+V+TV+Inf: [arrestierit, arresterit]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Sup: [arrestieritjit, arresteritjit]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Ger: [arrestieridijn, arresteridijn]
    arrestierit+V+TV+PrfPrc: [arrestierim, arresterim]
    arrestierit+V+TV+PrsPrc: [arrestierijiddje, arresterijiddje]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Actio+Ess: [arrestierimin, arresterimin]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Actio+Ela: [arrestierimis, arresterimis]
    arrestierit+V+TV+VAbess: [arrestierik, arresterik]
    arrestierit+V+TV+VGen: [arrestieri, arresteri]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [arrestieriv, arresteriv]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [arrestieri, arresteri]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [arrestieri, arresteri]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [arrestierijin, arresterijin]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [arrestieribihtte, arresteribihtte]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: [arrestieriba, arresteriba]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [arrestieribihtit, arresteribihtit]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Sh: [arrestieribit, arresteribit]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [arrestieriji, arresteriji]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [arrestierijiv, arresterijiv]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [arrestieriji, arresteriji]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [arrestierij, arresterij]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [arrestierijma, arresterijma] 
    arrestierit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [arrestierijda, arresterijda]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [arrestierijin, arresterijin]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: [arrestieri, arresteri]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl1: [arrestierijip, arresterijip]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: [arrestierijihtit, arresterijihtit]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2+Sh: [arrestierijit,arresterijit]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: [arrestierijisá, arresterijisá]
    arrestierit+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: [arrestierijuhtut, arresterijuhtut]
    arrestierit+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: [arrestierijusá, arresterijusá]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Pot+Pl1: [arrestieritjip, arresteritjip]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Pot+Pl2: [arrestieritjihpit, arresteritjihpit]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: [arrestieritji, arresteritji]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: [arrestieriduvvat, arresteriduvvat]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [arrestieriduvvá, arresteriduvvá]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [arrestieriduvvap, arresteriduvvap]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Cond+Sg2: [arrestierilulu, arresterilulu]
    arrestierit+V+TV+Cond+Pl1: [arrestierilulujma, arresterilulujma]
